Massachusetts, session 194th, H2152.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 175M of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “year”, in line 28, the following words:- ;
and provided further, that a covered individual taking family leave pursuant to clause (i) of
paragraph (1) of subsection (a) whose child required care in a neonatal intensive care unit shall
not be eligible in a benefit year for more than 16 weeks of family leave.
of 1